lt-LT: Laido medžiaga: Medvilnė; Kevlaras / aramidas; Oda; Nailonas; Parakordas; Poliesteris; Šilko juostelė; Kita
hu: Zsinór anyaga: Pamut; Kevlár/aramid; Bőr; Nejlon; Ejtőernyőzsinór (Paracord); Poliészter; Selyemszalag; Egyéb
es: Material del cable: Algodón; Kevlar/aramida; Cuero; Nailon; Paracord; Poliéster; Cinta de seda; Otro
pl: Materiał przewodu: Bawełna; Kevlar/aramid; Skóra; Nylon; Paracord; Poliester; Wstążka jedwabna; Inne
sk-SK: Materiál kábla: Bavlna; Kevlar/aramid; Koža; Nylon; Paracord; Polyester; Hodvábna stuha; Iné
tr: Kordon malzemesi: Pamuk; Kevlar/aramid; Deri; Naylon; Paracord; Polyester; İpek kurdele; Diğer
nl: Koordmateriaal: Katoen; Kevlar/aramide; Leer; Nylon; Paracord; Polyester; Zijden lint; Overig
pt-PT: Material do cordão: Algodão; Kevlar/aramida; Couro; Nylon; Paracord; Poliéster; Fita de seda; Outro
el: Υλικό νήματος: Βαμβάκι; Κέβλαρ/αραμίδιο; Δέρμα; Νάιλον; Paracord; Πολυεστέρας; Μεταξωτή κορδέλα; Άλλο
da: Ledningsmateriale: Bomuld; Kevlar/aramid; Læder; Nylon; Paracord; Polyester; Silkebånd; Andet
sv: Kabelmaterial: Bomull; Kevlar/aramid; Läder; Nylon; Paracord; Polyester; Sidenband; Annat
de: Schnurmaterial: Baumwolle; Kevlar/Aramid; Leder; Nylon; Paracord; Polyester; Seidenband; Sonstige
sl-SI: Material vrvice: Bombaž; Kevlar/aramid; Usnje; Najlon; Paracord; Poliester; Svileni trak; Drugo
ro-RO: Materialul cablului: Bumbac; Kevlar/aramidă; Piele; Nailon; Paracord; Poliester; Panglică de mătase; Altele
ja: コード素材: コットン; ケブラー / アラミド; レザー; ナイロン; パラコード; ポリエステル; シルクリボン; その他
fr: Matériau du cordon: Coton; Kevlar/aramide; Cuir; Nylon; Paracorde; Polyester; Ruban de soie; Autre
zh-CN: 挂绳材质: 棉; 凯夫拉/芳纶; 皮革; 尼龙; 伞绳; 聚酯纤维; 丝带; 其他
nb: Materiale i snor: Bomull; Kevlar/aramid; Lær; Nylon; Paracord; Polyester; Silkebånd; Annet
en: Cord material: Cotton; Kevlar/aramid; Leather; Nylon; Paracord; Polyester; Silk ribbon; Other
ko: 코드 소재: 면; 케블라/아라미드; 가죽; 나일론; 파라코드; 폴리에스터; 실크 리본; 기타
cs: Materiál šňůry: Bavlna; Kevlar/aramid; Kůže; Nylon; Paracord; Polyester; Hedvábná stuha; Jiné
bg-BG: Материал на кордата: Памук; Кевлар/арамид; Кожа; Найлон; Паракорд; Полиестер; Копринена панделка; Друг
vi: Chất liệu dây: Cotton; Kevlar/aramid; Da; Nylon; Dây paracord; Polyester; Dây ruy băng lụa; Khác
pt-BR: Material do cabo: Algodão; Kevlar/aramida; Couro; Nylon; Paracord; Poliéster; Fita de seda; Outro
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเชือก: ผ้าฝ้าย; เคฟลาร์/อะรามิด; หนัง; ไนลอน; พาราคอร์ด; โพลีเอสเตอร์; ริบบิ้นผ้าไหม; อื่นๆ
ru: Материал шнура: Хлопок; Кевлар / арамид; Кожа; Нейлон; Паракорд; Полиэстер; Шёлковая лента; Другое
zh-TW: 繩索材質: 棉; 克維拉 (Kevlar)/芳綸; 皮革; 尼龍; 傘繩; 聚酯纖維; 絲帶; 其他
it: Materiale del cavo: Cotone; Kevlar/aramide; Pelle; Nylon; Paracord; Poliestere; Nastro di seta; Altro
hr-HR: Materijal niti: Pamuk; Kevlar/aramid; Koža; Najlon; Paracord; Poliester; Svilena vrpca; Ostalo
fi: Narun materiaali: Puuvilla; Kevlar/aramidi; Nahka; Nailon; Laskuvarjonaru; Polyesteri; Silkkikangas; Muu